Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 13. Drunken Driving
§ 1213.
Ignition interlock restricted driver’s license or certificate; penalties.

An individual whose license or privilege to operate is suspended or revoked under this subchapter may operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, if issued a valid ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate. Upon application, the Commissioner shall issue an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate to an individual otherwise licensed or eligible to be licensed to operate a motor vehicle if:
(a) (1) An individual whose license or privilege to operate is suspended or revoked under this subchapter may operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, if issued a valid ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate. Upon application, the Commissioner shall issue an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate to an individual otherwise licensed or eligible to be licensed to operate a motor vehicle if:

the individual submits a $125.00 application fee;

the individual submits satisfactory proof of installation of an approved ignition interlock device in any motor vehicle to be operated and of financial responsibility as provided in section 801 of this title;

at least one year has passed since the suspension or revocation was imposed if the offense involved death or serious bodily injury to an individual other than the operator; and

the applicable period set forth in this subsection has passed since the suspension or revocation was imposed if the offense involved refusal of an enforcement officer’s reasonable request for an evidentiary test:

30 days for a first offense;

90 days for a second offense;

one year for a third or subsequent offense.

A new ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate shall expire at midnight on the eve of the second birthday of the applicant following the date of issue and may be renewed for one-year terms. The Commissioner shall send by first-class mail an application for renewal of the RDL or certificate at least 30 days prior to the day renewal is required and shall impose the same conditions for renewal as are required for initial issuance. The renewal fee shall be $125.00.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

If a fine is to be imposed for a conviction of a violation of section 1201 of this title, upon receipt of proof of installation of an approved ignition interlock device, the court may order that the fine of an individual with low-income conditionally be reduced by one-half to defray the costs of the ignition interlock device, subject to the individual’s ongoing operation under, and compliance with the terms of, a valid ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate as set forth in this section. In considering whether an individual’s fine should be reduced under this subsection, the court shall take into account any discount already provided by the device manufacturer or provider.

The holder of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate shall pay the costs of installing, purchasing or leasing, and removing the ignition interlock device as well as calibrating the device and retrieving data from it periodically as may be specified by the Commissioner.

Prior to the issuance of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate under this section, the Commissioner shall notify the applicant that the period prior to eligibility for reinstatement may be extended under subsections (f)-(h) of this section.
(f) (1) Prior to the issuance of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate under this section, the Commissioner shall notify the applicant that the period prior to eligibility for reinstatement may be extended under subsections (f)-(h) of this section.

Prior to any such extension of the reinstatement period, the ignition interlock RDL or certificate holder shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing. Service of the notice shall be sent by first-class mail to the last known address of the individual. The notice shall include a factual description of the grounds for an extension, a reference to the particular law allegedly violated, and a warning that the right to a hearing will be deemed waived, and an extension of the reinstatement period will be imposed, if a written request for a hearing is not received at the Department of Motor Vehicles within 15 days after the date of the notice.
(2) (A) Prior to any such extension of the reinstatement period, the ignition interlock RDL or certificate holder shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing. Service of the notice shall be sent by first-class mail to the last known address of the individual. The notice shall include a factual description of the grounds for an extension, a reference to the particular law allegedly violated, and a warning that the right to a hearing will be deemed waived, and an extension of the reinstatement period will be imposed, if a written request for a hearing is not received at the Department of Motor Vehicles within 15 days after the date of the notice.

When a holder receives a notice under subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (f), the holder shall be deemed to have waived the right to a hearing, unless a written request for a hearing is received at the Department of Motor Vehicles within 15 days after the date of the notice. If a hearing is not timely requested, the reinstatement period shall be extended in accordance with law.

The provisions of sections 105-107 of this title shall apply to hearings conducted under subdivision (2) of this subsection.

A holder of an ignition interlock RDL or certificate who, prior to eligibility for reinstatement under section 1209a or 1216 of this title, is prevented from starting a motor vehicle because the ignition interlock device records a blood alcohol concentration of 0.04 or above, shall be subject to a three-month extension of the applicable reinstatement period in the event of three such recorded events and to consecutive three-month extensions for every additional three recorded events thereafter. The Commissioner shall disregard a recording of 0.04 or above for the purposes of this subdivision if the Commissioner in his or her discretion finds, based on a pattern of tests or other reliable information, that the recording does not indicate the consumption of alcohol by the holder. The Commissioner shall notify the holder in writing after every recording of 0.04 or above that indicates the consumption of alcohol by the holder and, prior to any extension under this subdivision, the holder shall have the opportunity to be heard pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection (f).
(3) (A) A holder of an ignition interlock RDL or certificate who, prior to eligibility for reinstatement under section 1209a or 1216 of this title, is prevented from starting a motor vehicle because the ignition interlock device records a blood alcohol concentration of 0.04 or above, shall be subject to a three-month extension of the applicable reinstatement period in the event of three such recorded events and to consecutive three-month extensions for every additional three recorded events thereafter. The Commissioner shall disregard a recording of 0.04 or above for the purposes of this subdivision if the Commissioner in his or her discretion finds, based on a pattern of tests or other reliable information, that the recording does not indicate the consumption of alcohol by the holder. The Commissioner shall notify the holder in writing after every recording of 0.04 or above that indicates the consumption of alcohol by the holder and, prior to any extension under this subdivision, the holder shall have the opportunity to be heard pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection (f).

A holder of an ignition interlock RDL or certificate who, prior to eligibility for reinstatement under section 1209a or 1216 of this title, fails a random retest because the ignition interlock device records a blood alcohol concentration of 0.04 or above and below 0.08 shall be subject to consecutive three-month extensions of the applicable reinstatement period for every such recorded event. A holder who fails a random retest because of a recording of 0.08 or above shall be subject to consecutive six-month extensions of the applicable reinstatement period for every such recorded event. The Commissioner shall disregard a recording of 0.04 or above for the purposes of this subdivision if the Commissioner in his or her discretion finds, based on a pattern of tests or other reliable information, that the recording does not indicate the consumption of alcohol by the holder. The Commissioner shall notify the holder in writing after every recording of 0.04 or above that is indicative of the consumption of alcohol by the holder, and prior to any extension under this subdivision, the holder shall have the opportunity to be heard pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection (f).

The holder of an ignition interlock RDL or certificate shall operate only motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, shall not attempt or take any action to tamper with or otherwise circumvent an ignition interlock device, and, after failing a random retest, shall pull over and shut off the vehicle’s engine as soon as practicable. A person who violates any provision of this section commits a criminal offense, shall be subject to the sanctions and procedures provided for in subsections 674(b)-(i) of this title, and, upon conviction, the applicable period prior to eligibility for reinstatement under section 1209a or 1216 of this title shall be extended by six months.

A person who violates a rule adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection (l) of this section shall, after notice and an opportunity to be heard is provided pursuant to subdivision (f)(2) of this section, be subject to an extension of the period prior to eligibility for reinstatement under section 1209a or 1216 of this title in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner.

Upon receipt of notice that the holder of an ignition interlock RDL or certificate has been convicted of an offense under this title that would result in suspension, revocation, or recall of a license or privilege to operate, the Commissioner shall suspend, revoke, or recall the individual’s ignition interlock RDL or certificate for the same period that the license or privilege to operate would have been suspended, revoked, or recalled. The Commissioner may impose a reinstatement fee in accordance with section 675 of this title and require, prior to reinstatement, satisfactory proof of installation of an approved ignition interlock device and of financial responsibility as provided in section 801 of this title.

[Repealed.]

A person shall not knowingly and voluntarily tamper with an ignition interlock device on behalf of another person or otherwise assist another person to circumvent an ignition interlock device. A person adjudicated of a violation of this subsection shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $500.00.

The Commissioner, in consultation with any persons the Commissioner deems appropriate, shall adopt rules and may enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this section. The Commissioner shall not approve a manufacturer of ignition interlock devices as a provider in this State unless the manufacturer agrees to reduce the cost of installing, leasing, and deinstalling the device by at least 50 percent for persons who furnish proof of receipt of 3SquaresVT, LIHEAP, or Reach Up benefits or like benefits in another state.
(l) (1) The Commissioner, in consultation with any persons the Commissioner deems appropriate, shall adopt rules and may enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this section. The Commissioner shall not approve a manufacturer of ignition interlock devices as a provider in this State unless the manufacturer agrees to reduce the cost of installing, leasing, and deinstalling the device by at least 50 percent for persons who furnish proof of receipt of 3SquaresVT, LIHEAP, or Reach Up benefits or like benefits in another state.

The rules shall establish uniform performance standards for ignition interlock devices, including required levels of accuracy in measuring blood alcohol concentration, efficacy in distinguishing valid breath samples, the occurrence of random retests while the vehicle is running, and automatic signaling by the vehicle if the operator fails such a retest. After an initial random retest to occur within 15 minutes of the vehicle starting, subsequent random retests shall occur on average not more often than once every 30 minutes. The Commissioner shall certify devices that meet these standards, specify any periodic calibration that may be required to ensure accuracy of the devices, and specify the means and frequency of the retrieval and sharing of data collected by ignition interlock devices. The rules also shall establish a schedule of extensions of the period prior to eligibility for reinstatement as authorized under subsection (h) of this section.

Images and other individually identifiable information in the custody of a public agency related to the use of an ignition interlock device are exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall not be disclosed except:
(m) (1) Images and other individually identifiable information in the custody of a public agency related to the use of an ignition interlock device are exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall not be disclosed except:

pursuant to a warrant;

if a law enforcement officer, in good faith, believes that an emergency involving danger of death or serious bodily injury to any person requires access to the information without delay; or

in connection with enforcement proceedings under this section or rules adopted pursuant to this section.

Images or information disclosed in violation of this subsection shall be inadmissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 27, 2010; amended

2011, No. 46

, § 23;

2011, No. 46

, § 24, eff. June 30, 2011;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 47;

2015, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2017, No. 71

, § 14, eff. Aug. 7, 2017;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 194.

§ 1213a.
Immobilization of vehicle.

Immobilization. At the time of sentencing after a second or subsequent conviction under section 1201 of this title, the court may, upon the motion of the State, and in addition to any penalty imposed by law, order the motor vehicle operated by the defendant at the time of the offense seized and immobilized by a law enforcement agency designated by the court, as provided in this section and section 1213c of this title.

Immobilization on owner’s property. A motor vehicle subject to an immobilization order shall be immobilized, whenever possible, on property owned by the owner of the vehicle or on a parking space legally available to the owner of the vehicle. An immobilized vehicle is not exempt from enforcement of liens held by third parties.

Immobilization on State or private property. If the owner of the motor vehicle does not own property or have a parking area on which the vehicle can be immobilized, the vehicle shall be impounded on property owned by the State or on private property. All costs of impoundment shall be paid by the defendant. The period of impoundment shall run as if the vehicle were immobilized.

Expiration of immobilization order. An order of immobilization under this section shall expire in 18 months or when the defendant obtains a valid operator’s license, whichever comes first.

Release of vehicle. When an immobilization order expires, and when the costs provided for in this section have been paid in full by the defendant, the vehicle shall be released to its owner.

Costs. All costs of towing and impoundment shall be paid by the defendant before the vehicle is released to its owner. If the defendant fails to pay the towing and impoundment costs within 30 days after the immobilization order expires, the State is authorized to sell the vehicle by public auction pursuant to the procedures in 27 V.S.A. chapter 13. The proceeds from the sale of the vehicle shall be used first to offset the costs of towing, impounding, and releasing the vehicle. Any balance remaining, after any liens on the vehicle have been paid in full, shall be paid to the owner of the vehicle.

Disbursement of proceeds. Proceeds from the defendant’s payment of the release fee and towing and impoundment costs shall be disbursed to the law enforcement agencies that incurred the costs.

Tampering. A person who tampers with an immobilization device or mobilizes a vehicle that is subject to an order of immobilization shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1213b.
Forfeiture of vehicle.

At the time of sentencing after a third or subsequent conviction under section 1201 of this title or after a conviction under subdivision 1130(c)(1) of this title, or upon a determination by the Parole Board that a person has violated a condition of parole requiring that the person not operate a motor vehicle, the court may, upon motion of the State and in addition to any penalty imposed by law and after notice and hearing, order the motor vehicle operated by the defendant or parolee at the time of the offense forfeited and sold as provided in section 1213c of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 19; amended

2011, No. 56

, § 12, eff. May 31, 2011.

§ 1213c.
Immobilization and forfeiture proceedings.

Notice. The State shall provide the following persons with notice of an immobilization or forfeiture hearing:

the defendant;

the registered owner or owners;

any holder of a security interest in or lien on the vehicle; and

any other person appearing to be an innocent owner or operator as described in subsection (g) of this section.

Content of notice. The notice shall contain the following:

a description of the motor vehicle, including vehicle identification number, make, model, and year;

the name of the registered owner or owners, lienholder, and any other person appearing to be an innocent owner or operator as described in subsection (g) of this section;

the date, time, and place of the hearing; and

a statement that any person who is an owner, an innocent owner or operator, or who holds a security interest in or claims any interest in the motor vehicle may appear and be heard at the hearing to protect the person’s interest in the motor vehicle.

Service of notice. The notice of hearing shall be served as provided for in the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure on the registered owner or owners and any lienholders as shown on the certificate of title for the vehicle as shown in the records of the department of motor vehicles in the state in which the vehicle is registered or titled.

Hearing. The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether or not to order the motor vehicle immobilized or forfeited. The proceeding shall be against the motor vehicle and shall be deemed civil in nature.

Hardship consideration. In determining the motion, the court may consider any undue hardship that immobilization or forfeiture would cause to a person, other than the defendant, who is dependent on the motor vehicle for essential transportation needs. In making such determination, the court shall consider any evidence of past or current domestic violence.

Order. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order. The court may order the motor vehicle immobilized or forfeited if the court finds that:

the motor vehicle is subject to immobilization or forfeiture;

the notice as required by this section was served; and

no party has shown that he or she is an innocent owner or operator as described in subsection (g) of this section.

Rights of innocent owner or operator. The court shall not order the immobilization or forfeiture of a motor vehicle if an owner, co-owner, or person who regularly operates the motor vehicle, other than the defendant, shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the owner, co-owner, or regular operator did not consent to or have any express or implied knowledge that the motor vehicle was being or was intended to be operated in a manner that would subject the motor vehicle to immobilization or forfeiture, or that the owner, co-owner, or regular operator had no reasonable opportunity or capacity to prevent the defendant from operating the motor vehicle.

Rented or leased vehicles. A vehicle that is rented or leased for a period of less than one year shall not be subject to immobilization or forfeiture unless it is established in the proceedings that the owner of the rented or leased vehicle knew of or consented to the operation of the motor vehicle in a manner that would subject the vehicle to immobilization or forfeiture.

Lienholder. If the court finds that a person has an enforceable lien on or other interest in the motor vehicle that is not held through a straw purchase, trust, or otherwise for the actual benefit of another and that the person did not know of or consent to the operation of the motor vehicle in a manner that would subject the vehicle to immobilization or forfeiture, the court shall:

permit the person to enforce the lien or other interest as provided by law if such enforcement does not result in the return of the motor vehicle to the defendant; or

upon immobilization or forfeiture, order compensation to the person, to the extent of the person’s interest, from the proceeds of the resulting sale.

Order of forfeiture. If the court orders the motor vehicle forfeited, it shall be delivered into the custody of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, who shall dispose of the motor vehicle pursuant to

29 V.S.A. § 1556

. The proceeds from the sale of the vehicle shall first be used to offset any costs of selling the vehicle and then, after any liens on the vehicle have been paid in full, applied to any unpaid restitution owed by the defendant in connection with the charge that resulted in forfeiture. Any balance remaining shall be deposited into the General Fund.

Appeal. A decision of the court under this section may be appealed as a matter of right to the Supreme Court.

Disbursement of proceeds. Proceeds from the defendant’s payment of the release fee and towing and impoundment costs shall be disbursed to the law enforcement agencies that incurred the costs.

Owning, leasing, and renting prohibited. After issuance of an immobilization or forfeiture order, and during the defendant’s license suspension or revocation period, the defendant shall not operate, purchase, lease, or rent a motor vehicle. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

Selling or encumbering prohibited.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, after a person is detained, arrested, lodged, or released upon citation for a second or subsequent violation of section 1201 of this title, no person shall sell, transfer, or encumber the title to a vehicle that the person knows may be subject to immobilization under section 1213a of this title or forfeiture under section 1213b of this title, unless approved by the court in which the charge is filed for good cause shown. A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

If the State has not commenced a prosecution for a second or subsequent violation of section 1201 of this title within 90 days of the detention, arrest, lodging, or release upon citation, the person may sell, transfer, or encumber the subject vehicle.

Funding. A law enforcement or prosecution agency conducting forfeitures under this section may accept, receive, and disburse in furtherance of its duties and functions under this section any appropriations, grants, and donations made available by the State of Vermont and its agencies, the federal government and its agencies, any municipality or other unit of local government, or private or civil sources.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2001, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 41

, § 1;

2007, No. 40

, § 7;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 161;

2015, No. 53

, § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 195, 196.

§ 1214.
Repealed. 1991, No. 55, § 20.

§ 1215.
Injunctive relief.

If the Commissioner has not reinstated a license after the suspension or revocation period has run under this subchapter, and the person alleges he or she has complied with section 1209a of this title or alleges that the alcohol assessment screening does not indicate that therapy should be a condition of reinstatement, he or she may seek injunctive relief in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in the manner provided by the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. In such actions, the Driver Rehabilitation Program Director shall be the proper defendant.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 68

, § 10, Dec. 1, 1989; amended

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. April 22, 1996;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 1216.
Persons under 21 years of age; alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more.

A person under 21 years of age who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more commits a civil traffic violation subject to the jurisdiction of the Judicial Bureau and subject to the following sanctions:

For a first violation, the person’s license or privilege to operate shall be suspended for six months and until the person complies with subdivision 1209a(a)(1) of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title. A person who elects to operate under an RDL or certificate shall not be eligible for reinstatement unless he or she operates under the RDL or certificate for six months, plus any extension of this period arising from a violation of section 1213 of this title.

For a second or subsequent violation, the person’s license or privilege to operate shall be suspended until the person reaches 21 years of age or for one year, whichever is longer, and complies with subdivisions 1209a(a)(2)(A), (B), and (D) of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title. A person who elects to operate under an RDL or certificate shall not be eligible for reinstatement unless he or she operates under the RDL or certificate for one year or until the person reaches 21 years of age, whichever is longer, plus any extension of this period arising from a violation of section 1213 of this title.

[Repealed.]

A person who violates this section may also be subject to recall of his or her provisional license under section 607a of this title.

If a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is violating this section, the officer may request the person to submit to a breath test using a preliminary screening device approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety. A refusal to submit to the breath test shall be considered a violation of this section. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in sections 1202 and 1203 of this title:

the results of the test shall be admissible evidence in a proceeding under this section; and

there shall be no statutory right to counsel prior to the administration of the test.

In a proceeding under this section, if there was at any time within two hours of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person’s alcohol concentration was 0.02 or more at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control.

No fine and no points shall be assessed for a violation of this section.

The Alcohol and Driving Program required under this section shall be administered by the Department of Health’s Division of Substance Use Programs and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of operators under 21 years of age.

A charge of violating this section shall not bar prosecution for any crime, including a prosecution under section 1201 of this title.

Suspensions imposed under this section or any comparable statute of any other jurisdiction shall run concurrently with suspensions imposed under sections 1205, 1206, and 1208 of this title or any comparable statutes of any other jurisdiction or with any suspension resulting from a conviction for a violation of section 1091 of this title from the same incident, and a person shall receive credit for any elapsed period of a suspension served in Vermont against a later suspension imposed in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 55

, § 17; amended

1997, No. 57

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 9, 27;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 46

, § 9, eff. July 2, 2011;

2011, No. 56

, § 18, eff. March 1, 2012;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 57

, § 20;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2021, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 1217.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 1218.
Commercial motor vehicles; 0.04.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle:

when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.04 or more; or

when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or

when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree which renders the person incapable of driving safely.

A violation of this section shall result in disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle as provided in section 4116 of this title or in suspension of the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle as provided in section 4116a of this title. Those provisions of section 1205 of this title that establish a procedure for civil suspensions shall apply to this section, except that where that section refers to alcohol concentration it shall be deemed to refer to an alcohol concentration of 0.04.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 88

, § 13, eff. April 1, 1992; amended

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 1219.
Commercial motor vehicle; detectable amount; out-of-service.

A person who is operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle with any measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in his or her system shall immediately be placed out-of-service for 24 hours by an enforcement officer.
A law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has a measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in his or her system on the basis of the person’s general appearance, conduct, or other substantiating evidence may request the person to submit to a test, which may be administered with a preliminary screening device.
The law enforcement officer shall inform the person at the time the test is requested that refusal to submit will result in disqualification.
If the person refuses to submit to the test, the person shall immediately be placed out-of-service for 24 hours and shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle as provided in section 4116 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 88

, § 14.

§ 1220.
Repealed. 2021, No. 76, § 33, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 1220a.
DUI Enforcement Special Fund.

There is created a DUI Enforcement Special Fund, which shall be a special fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The DUI Enforcement Special Fund shall be a continuation of and successor to the DUI Enforcement Special Fund established under subsection 1205(r) of this title.

The DUI Enforcement Special Fund shall consist of:

receipts from the surcharges assessed under section 206 and subsections 674(i), 1091(d), 1094(f), 1128(d), 1133(d), 1205(r), and 1210(k) of this title;

beginning in fiscal year 2000 and thereafter, the first $150,000.00 of revenues collected from fines imposed under subchapter 13 of chapter 13 of this title pertaining to DUI related offenses;

beginning May 1, 2013 and thereafter, $0.0038 per gallon of the revenues raised by the motor fuel tax on gasoline imposed by chapter 28 of this title, except for the revenues raised by the tax on aviation gasoline; and

any additional funds transferred or appropriated by the General Assembly.

The DUI Enforcement Special Fund shall be used for the implementation and enforcement of this subchapter for purposes specified and in amounts appropriated by the General Assembly. Effort shall be given to awarding grants to municipalities or law enforcement agencies for innovative programs designed to reduce DUI offenses, and priority shall be given to grants requested jointly by more than one law enforcement agency or municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 41; amended

1999, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 77, eff. May 29, 2000;

2011, No. 56

, § 6, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 12

, § 25, eff. May 1, 2013;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 1220b.
Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund.

There is created a Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund, which shall be a special fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.

The Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund shall consist of receipts from the surcharges assessed under subsection 1210(i) of this title.

The Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund shall be used for the implementation and support of the Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Program within the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 19, eff. March 1, 2012.